Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-54] Biosecurity program; charges;
costs. (a) The department shall set and impose charges for the
inspection, quarantine, and eradication of pests in accordance with this
chapter and chapter 141. The department shall deposit the charges into the
pest inspection, quarantine, and eradication fund established pursuant to
section 150A-4.5.

(b) The department shall set the charges at
amounts intended to generate revenues that, when combined with federal and
other funds, are sufficient to pay for the operating and maintenance cost of
the program and debt service on bonds issued to fund facilities constructed for
the program. [L 2008, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next